Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

32-11.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Fountain Creek Watershed, Flood Control, and Greenway District Act".

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 840, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The Fountain creek watershed, including Fountain creek, related wetlands, existing trails, and recreational facilities, is a unique and high quality watershed that is an important resource and asset to the people of El Paso county, Pueblo county, and the state of Colorado;

There are many challenges arising from the unique nature of the Fountain creek watershed, including torrential storms that occur intermittently in urban and rural areas that drain into Fountain creek and result in increased potential for flood danger to property, natural resources, and persons within the urban and rural areas of the watershed;

It is necessary to address flooding, drainage, sedimentation, water quality, water quantity, and erosion problems within the Fountain creek watershed in El Paso county and Pueblo county;

Because the Fountain creek watershed is physically located in both El Paso county and Pueblo county and crosses the jurisdictional boundaries of the two counties, the cities of Colorado Springs, Fountain, Manitou Springs, and Pueblo, and the towns of Palmer Lake, Green Mountain Falls, and Monument, the watershed includes large areas of both incorporated and unincorporated land, which has:

Resulted in the fragmentation and proliferation among the counties and municipalities of powers, rights, privileges, and duties pertaining to storm water, flood mitigation, and attenuation and drainage within the watershed; and

Left the counties and municipalities unable to acquire suitable capital improvements for the mitigation of the flooding, drainage, and erosion problems within the watershed;

In order to address flooding, drainage, sedimentation, water quality, water quantity, and erosion problems and recreational opportunities within the Fountain creek watershed and effectively protect, develop, and use the natural resources within the watershed, it is necessary and appropriate to create the Fountain creek watershed, flood control, and greenway district and to authorize the district to primarily manage, administer, and fund the capital improvements necessary in the Fountain creek watershed and the Fountain creek watershed management area to:

Prevent and mitigate flooding, sedimentation, and erosion;

Improve water quality and otherwise address water quality and water quantity issues;

Improve drainage;

Fund the acquisition and protection of open space;

Develop public recreational opportunities, including parks, trails, and open space; and

Improve wildlife and aquatic habitat and restore, enhance, establish, and preserve wetlands.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

A general law cannot be made applicable to the Fountain creek watershed, flood control, and greenway district, or to the properties, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities pertaining thereto as provided in this article, because of the number of atypical factors and special conditions concerning them;

The creation of the Fountain creek watershed, flood control, and greenway district promotes the health, comfort, safety, convenience, and welfare of all the people of the state and is of special benefit to the inhabitants of the district and the property within the district;

All property to be acquired by the district under this article shall be owned, operated, administered, and maintained for and on behalf of all of the people of the district;

All legal and available funding sources shall be available to the district, including, but not limited to, mill levies, service fees, special assessments, and gifts, grants, and donations from public, private, and not-for-profit sources.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 840, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Assessable property" means any tract of land in an improvement district specially benefited by a project paid for in whole or in part by the district by the levy of assessments other than:

A tract owned by the federal government absent its consent to the assessment of the tract; or

A street, alley, highway, or other public right-of-way of a public body.

"Assessment unit" means a unit or quasi-improvement district designated by the board for the purpose of petition, remonstrance, and assessment in the case of a combination of projects in an improvement district.

"Board" means the board of directors of the district.

"Bond" means any bond, note, warrant, interim certificate, contract, or other evidence of indebtedness of the district issued or otherwise executed pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, any obligation to the United States in connection with a loan from or guaranteed by the United States.

"Chairperson" means the presiding officer of the board or his or her successor in functions, if any.

"Citizens advisory group" means the citizens appointed by the board to represent various interests identified in this article and to consult with and offer advice to the board on managing the watershed.

"Condemnation" or "condemn" means the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the district for the purpose of acquiring property for any project, facilities, or interest therein authorized by the district pursuant to this article.

"Corporate district" means a district constituting a body corporate and politic and a political subdivision of the state, including, but not limited to, a school district, a local college district, a special district created pursuant to article 1 of this title, any other kind of district created pursuant to this title, a public improvement district, or a local improvement district; except that "corporate district" does not include the district or an improvement district.

"Corridor" means an area generally northerly to southerly along Fountain creek that consists of the portion of the one-hundred-year floodplain of Fountain Creek, as defined by the federal emergency management agency and further identified on maps promulgated by the agency, hereinafter referred to as the "FEMA one-hundred-year floodplain", consisting of floodplains in El Paso county that lie south of the municipal limits of the city of Fountain and the floodplain in Pueblo county that lies north of the municipal limits of the city of Pueblo.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), public bodies not represented on the board, through their governing bodies, may consent to the jurisdiction of the district and add property to the corridor. The represented public bodies shall also have the option of adding additional sections of the watershed within their respective jurisdictional boundaries to the corridor and consent to the jurisdiction of the district.

"Director" means a member of the board.

"District" means the Fountain creek watershed, flood control, and greenway district created in section 32-11.5-201, the boundary of which is defined in section 32-11.5-202.

"Eligible elector" means an eligible elector as defined in section 32-1-103 (5).

"Engineer" means any engineer in the permanent employ of the district, any licensed professional engineer, or any firm of professional engineers as determined by the board that:

Has skill and experience in the field of designing and preparing plans and specifications for and supervising the construction of facilities like those the district is authorized to acquire;

Is practicing engineering under the laws of the state; and

Is selected, retained, and compensated by the district as required by section 32-11.5-205 (1)(h)(I).

"Equip" means the furnishing of all necessary or desirable, related, or appurtenant machinery, furnishings, apparatus, paraphernalia, and other gear, or any combination thereof, pertaining to any project or other property of the district, or any interest therein, authorized in this article or otherwise relating to facilities.

"Facilities" means all or any portion of the drainage, flood control, and recreational system of the district, consisting of all property owned or acquired by the district through purchase, construction, or otherwise, that is used by the district in connection with drainage, flood control, and recreation, whether situated within or outside, or both within and outside, the territory of the district, including, but not limited to, water rights for recreational or flood control uses, or both, natural and artificial watercourses for the collection, channeling, impounding, and disposition of rainfall, other surface and subsurface drainage, and storm and flood waters, including, but not limited to, ditches, ponds, dams, spillways, retarding basins, detention basins, nonpoint source water quality treatment and abatement systems, lakes, reservoirs, canals, channels, levees, revetments, dikes, walls, embankments, bridges, inlets, outlets, connections, laterals, other collection lines, intercepting sewers, outfalls, outfall sewers, trunk sewers, force mains, submains, waterlines, sluices, flumes, syphons, sewer lines, pipes, other transmission lines, culverts, pumping stations, gauging stations, stream gauges, rain gauges, engines, valves, pumps, meters, junction boxes, manholes, other inlet and outlet structures, motor vehicles, bucket machines, inlet and outlet cleaners, backhoes, draglines, graders, other equipment, apparatus, fixtures, structures, and buildings, flood warning services, and appurtenant telephone, telegraph, radio, and television apparatus, other water diversion, drainage, and flood control facilities, trails, open space, habitat for wildlife and aquatic life, and all appurtenances and incidentals necessary, useful, or desirable for any such facilities including real and other property therefor.

"Fiscal year" means the twelve months commencing on the first day of January of any calendar year and ending on the last day of December of the same calendar year.

"Fountain creek watershed" or "watershed" means the watershed officially denominated by the United States government as "watershed boundary dataset, hydraulic unit code # 11020003, Fountain creek sub-basin of the Arkansas river, Colorado".

"Fountain creek watershed management area" or "watershed management area" means that portion of the district that consists of townships within the watershed and other townships that will benefit from improvements to the watershed and that is legally described as townships 11s68w, 11s67w, 11s66w, 12s68w, 12s67w, 12s66w, 12s65w, 13s68w, 13s67w, 13s66w, 13s65w, 14s68w, 14s67w, 14s66w, 14s65w, 14s64w, 15s67w, 15s66w, 15s65w, 15s64w, 16s67w, 16s66w, 16s65w, 16s64w, 17s66w, 17s65w, 17s64w, 18s66w, 18s65w, 18s64w, 19s66w, 19s65w, 19s64w, 20s66w, 20s65w, 20s64w, 21s66w, 21s65w, 21s64w of the 6th principal meridian.

"Governing body" means a city council, board of town trustees, board of county commissioners, board of directors, or other entity in which the legislative powers of a public body are vested.

"Improvement" or "improve" means the extension, enlargement, betterment, alteration, reconstruction, replacement, or major repair of facilities, a project, infrastructure, related property, or an interest therein.

"Improvement district" means a contiguous or noncontiguous geographical area within the watershed management area that is designated and delineated by the board by an assigned number or in some other manner that separately identifies it from any other improvement district and contains facilities or a project, or an interest in facilities or a project, the cost of which is to be defrayed wholly or in part by the levy of special assessments against each tract within the area.

"Infrastructure" means one or more elements of a drainage or flood control system that is similar in kind to facilities but owned by a public body or other person other than the district.

"Mailed notice" means any designated written or printed notice addressed to the owner of record of each tract assessed or to be assessed by deposit at least fourteen days prior to the designated hearing or other time or event in the United States mail, postage prepaid, as first-class mail.

"Municipality" means an incorporated city or town.

"Newspaper" means a newspaper printed in the English language at least once each calendar week.

"Project" means any facility or related group of facilities that the board determines to authorize, construct, or acquire at one time.

"Publication" or "publish" means one publication at least fourteen days prior to the date of a hearing or event in each official newspaper designated by the district pursuant to section 32-11.5-205 (1)(l).

"Public body" means the state of Colorado or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof; any county, municipality, corporate district, authority, or state institution of higher education; or any other body corporate and politic and political subdivision of the state.

"Public body" does not include the federal government or the district.

"Represented public body" means a public body that is entitled, alone or in concert with another public body, to appoint one or more directors to the board.

"Service charges" means the fees, rates, and other charges for the use of the facilities of the district or for any related service rendered by the district.

"Small municipalities" means, collectively, the town of Green Mountain Falls, the city of Manitou Springs, the town of Monument, and the town of Palmer Lake, Colorado.

"Special assessment" means a charge levied against any tract specially benefited in an improvement district by any project that shall be made on a front-foot, zone, area, or other equitable basis as determined by the board; except that the charge shall not exceed the estimated maximum special benefits to the tract assessed as determined by the board pursuant to part 5 of this article.

"Technical advisory committee" means the advisory committee made up of technical experts appointed by the board to provide recommendations to the board regarding public policy or expenditure of funds for the benefit of the watershed.

"Tract" means any lot or other parcel of land for assessment purposes, whether platted or unplatted, regardless of lot or land lines.

Lots, plots, blocks, and other subdivisions may be designated in accordance with any recorded plat thereof, and all lands, platted and unplatted, shall be designated by a definite legal description.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 842, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-104. Public purpose - liberal construction - sufficiency of article.

The exercise of any power authorized in this article by the board on behalf of the district and any project authorized pursuant to this article effects a public purpose.

This article being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, and general welfare, the rule of strict construction shall not apply to this article. This article shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Except as otherwise provided in the state constitution, section 25-8-102 (4), C.R.S., or this article, this article, without reference to any other law, shall constitute full authority for the exercise of the powers granted in this article, including without limitation the financing of any project authorized in this article wholly or in part and the issuance of bonds to evidence the financing.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, no other law with regard to the authorization or issuance of bonds or the exercise of any other power granted in this article that provides for an election, requires an approval, or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts authorized in this article shall apply to proceedings taken under or acts done pursuant to this article.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, no notice, consent, or approval by any public body or officer thereof shall be required as a prerequisite to the sale or issuance of any bonds or the making of any contract or the exercise of any other power under this article.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this article shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law.

Nothing in this article shall repeal or affect any other law except to the extent that this article is inconsistent with any other law, this article being intended to provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives and not an exclusive one. This article shall not be construed as repealing, amending, or changing any other law except to the extent that the other law is inconsistent with this article. This article shall not be construed as repealing, modifying, or amending any existing law or court decree concerning the determination or administration of water rights.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 846, § 1, effective April 30.